Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-412
Legislative Council; library facilities; receipt and use of funds.

The Legislative Council and Legislature shall have access to all library reference facilities maintained by state agencies. The council is authorized to accept and use any funds made available to it through the terms of any cooperative agreement that it may make with any agency whatsoever for the accomplishment of the purposes of sections 50-401 to 50-415.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 8, p. 423;

Laws 1939, c. 60, § 3, p. 262;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-508;

R.S.1943, § 50-412;

Laws 1992, LB 898, § 3.